Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Chapter 64. Livestock Care Standards Advisory Council

§ 791.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Agency” means the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

“Council” means the Livestock Care Standards Advisory Council.

“Livestock” means cattle, calves, sheep, swine, horses, mules, goats, fallow deer, American bison, poultry, and any other animal that can or may be used in and for the preparation of meat, fiber, or poultry products.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

2017, No. 30

, § 2.

§ 792.
Establishment of Livestock Care Standards Advisory Council.

There is established the Livestock Care Standards Advisory Council for the purposes of evaluating the laws of the State and of providing policy recommendations regarding the care, handling, and well-being of livestock in the State. The Livestock Care Standards Advisory Council shall be composed of the following members, all of whom shall be residents of Vermont:

The Secretary, who shall serve as the Chair of the Council.

The State Veterinarian.

The following six members appointed by the Governor:

A person with knowledge of food safety and food safety regulation in the State.

A person from a statewide organization that represents the beef industry.

A Vermont licensed livestock or poultry veterinarian.

A representative of an agricultural department of a Vermont college or university.

A representative of the Vermont slaughter industry.

A representative of the Vermont livestock dealer, hauler, or auction industry.

The following three members appointed by the Committee on Committees:

A producer of species other than bovidae.

An operator of a medium farm or large farm permitted by the Agency.

A professional in the care and management of equines and equine facilities.

The following three members appointed by the Speaker of the House:

An operator of a small Vermont dairy farm.

A representative of a local humane society from Vermont and organized under State law.

A person with experience investigating charges of animal cruelty involving livestock, provided that no such person who has received or is receiving compensation from a national humane society or organization may be appointed under this subdivision.

Members of the Council shall be appointed for staggered terms of three years. Except for the Chair, the State Veterinarian, and the representative of the agricultural department of a Vermont college or university, no member of the Council may serve for more than two consecutive full terms. Eight members of the Council shall constitute a quorum. If a vacancy on the Council occurs, a new member shall be appointed, in the same manner that his or her predecessor was appointed, to fill the unexpired term.

With the concurrence of the Chair, the Council may use the services and staff of the Agency in the performance of its duties.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

2017, No. 30

, § 2.

§ 793.
Powers and duties of Livestock Care Standards Advisory Council.

The Council shall:

Review and evaluate the laws and rules of the State applicable to the care and handling of livestock. In conducting the evaluation required by this section, the Council shall consider the following:

the overall health and welfare of livestock species;

agricultural best management practices;

biosecurity and disease prevention;

animal morbidity and mortality data;

food safety practices;

the protection of local and affordable food supplies for consumers; and

humane transport and slaughter practices.

Submit policy recommendations to the Secretary on any of the subject matter set forth under subdivision (1) of this subsection. A copy of the policy recommendations submitted to the Secretary shall be provided to the House Committee on Agriculture and Forestry and the Senate Committee on Agriculture. Recommendations may be in the form of proposed legislation. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report to be made under this subdivision.

Meet at least annually and at such other times as the Chair determines to be necessary.

Submit minutes of the Council annually, on or before January 15, to the House Committee on Agriculture and Forestry and the Senate Committee on Agriculture. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report to be made under this subdivision.

The Council may engage in education and outreach activities related to the laws and regulations for the care and handling of livestock. The Council may accept funds from public or private sources in compliance with

32 V.S.A. § 5

.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2017, No. 30

, § 2.